Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202286-1311
Act; how construed; commission; duties.

(1) Nothing in the Nebraska Broadband Bridge Act shall be construed to authorize the commission to regulate Internet services as prohibited by subdivision (1)(d) of section 86-124.

(2) The commission shall take reasonable steps to ensure that an applicant meets the obligations described in subsections (2) and (3) of section 86-1308. The commission shall not deny an application based on prices or terms and conditions offered, or regulate any term of service. The commission's weighted scoring system under subdivision (2)(c) of section 86-1306 may take into consideration an applicant's terms and conditions of service.

Laws 2022, LB1144, § 10.